indra/newview/app_settings/dictionaries/fr_fr.dic
accentuai/jnmtlw
acclimaterai/jnmtlx
accomplir/Mnmtls
accord/LMS
accouple/jnmtlu
accoutumée/LMQF
accueillerai/jnmtlx
acidulai/jnmtlw
acrotère/LMS
Adelbert/MQ
adjectivale/LMF
adjoindre/Mnmtls
aèrerai/jnmtlx
affabulatrice/LMQG
affectionnai/jnmtlw
affleurai/jnlw
affriolante/LMF
affruite/jnu
africaniser/Mnmtls
agitée/LMF
agoraphobe/LMQS
agriffer/mts
agrippe/jnmtlu
agronomie/LMS
aiguiseuse/LMQG
ajusteuse/LMQG
alarmerai/jnmtlx
alertai/jnmtlw
alésoir/LMS
Alfortville/MQ
aliter/Mnmtls
alors/MQU
Alphonse/MQ
amaigris/jnluw
amaigrissante/LMF
ambivalente/LMF
américaine/LMQF
ammonite/LMS
amollirai/jnmtlx
amuïr/s
amusais/jnmtlv
amuse/jnmtlu
analgésiai/jnmtlw
analyse/LMjnmtlSu
ancestrale/LMF
annamite/LMS
anoblis/jnmtluw
anomale/LMF
Antibes/MQ
antibois/LM
apologiste/LMS
aposterai/jnmtlx
applaudir/Mnmtls
apporter/Mnmtl
apprête/jnmtlu
arcboutai/jnlw
ardennaise/LMQF
arguai/jnmtlw
argue/jnmtlu
armorie/jnmtlu
artérite/LMS
articulaire/LMS
Asimov/MQ
aspirine/LMS
assassiner/Mnmtls
assénerai/jnmtlx
assister/Mnmtls
associatrice/LMG
assortissais/jnlv
atrophiée/F
attaquer/Mnmtls
attardai/jnmtlw
atteignais/jnmtlv
au/LMQUX
auge/LMS
aujourd'hui/MQU
Aurore/MQ
authentiquerai/jnmtlx
autogestion/LMS
autopsier/Mnmtl
avais/jnmtl
avertir/Mnmtls
aveu/LMX
banquette/Fu
batifoleuse/G
berçante/S
bigorneau/X
blonde/F
brocanteuse/G
bronze/Su
but/S
caïeu/X
centralisatrice/G
chameau/X
chaouch/S
chapée/F
chevrote/u
ciseau/X
codébitrice/G
comput/S
conte/Su
contrainte/F
couteau/X
créditrice/G
curable/S
débarrasse/u
défraichis/uw
dépenaillée/F
déplâtre/u
désirable/S
détalle/u
détrousseuse/G
eau/LMX
ébouriffai/jnmtlw
ébouter/Mnmtl
ébrécher/Mnls
écachais/jnlv
échafaudage/LMS
échaudai/jnmtlw
échauffer/Mnmtls
échenille/jnmtlu
écorerai/jnlx
écorne/jnmtlu
écossée/F
écotype/LMS
écraserai/jnmtlx
écrirai/jnmtlx
écrivailleuse/LMQG
éducative/LMF
effarouchai/jnmtlw
effleurer/Mnmtls
égarai/jnmtlw
égermais/jnlv
électrodynamomètre/LMS
élus/jnmtlw
émanciper/Mnmtls
embarrasser/Mnmtls
embastillai/jnmtlw
embaucherai/jnmtlx
emberlificote/jnmtlu
emberlificoteuse/LMQG
embrasseuse/LMQG
emmaillote/jnmtlu
emmènerai/jnmtlx
emmiellai/jnmtlw
emmurai/jnmtlw
émondais/jnmtlv
émotionner/Mnmtls
empattée/F
empoisonne/jnmtlu
émulsine/LMS
émus/jnmtlw
en/LMQUjnmts
encabanage/LMS
encanailler/Mnls
encarte/jnmtlu
enchevauchai/jnlw
encloîtrai/jnlw
enclouais/jnmtlv
encombre/jnmtlu
endimanche/jnmtlu
enfiler/Mnmtls
enflammai/jnmtlw
enharnachais/jnlv
énielle/jnlu
enjoins/jnmtlu
enjôlerai/jnmtlx
enlumineuse/LMQG
ennuyer/Mnmtls
ensilée/F
entable/jnlu
entachais/jnmtlv
entérocolite/LMS
entrais/jnmtlv
entre/MQUjnmtlu
entre-heurter/s
entube/jnmtlu
épannerai/jnlx
épaulette/LMS
épelle/jnmtlu
époustouflerai/jnmtlx
épouvante/LMjnmtlSu
éprouvais/jnmtlv
épuiser/Mnmtls
équiper/Mnmtls
Ermont/MQ
esbigner/mts
escarrifierai/jnlx
esquintée/F
essaie/jnmtlu
essieu/LMX
est/MQUnmtls
estuaire/LMS
étalageais/jnmtlv
étalonnai/jnmtlw
étirerai/jnmtlx
étoffe/LMjnmtlSu
européanisai/jnlw
Évry/MQ
exceptai/jnlw
exciser/Mnmtl
exclure/Mnmtls
exempter/Mnmtls
exhausserai/jnmtlx
expéditrice/LMQG
expressionniste/LMS
expurger/Mnmtl
fâcheuse/F
farine/Su
fendage/S
fléau/X
frotteuse/G
gamopétale/S
gargarise/u
géniale/F
géosynclinal/X
hafnium/S
hâtiveau/X
herbagerai/jnmtlx
hippocampe/LMS
historiais/jnlv
holonome/LMS
Homère/MQ
homogénéifier/Mnls
homologuerai/jnmtlx
hourde/u
hydratante/LMF
hydrolyser/Mnl
hypersustentatrice/LMG
icelui/M
idéologiquement/LMQU
il/QsS
Île-de-France/LM
immiscer/mts
inaltérée/LMF
inciserai/jnmtlx
incliner/Mnmtls
incontrôlable/LMS
indifférenciée/LMF
infestais/jnlv
infestation/LMS
inhiber/Mnmtl
innocenterai/jnmtlx
insaisissable/LMS
installatrice/LMQG
intensifie/jnmtlu
intercalais/jnmtlv
interlinéaire/LMS
interpréter/Mnmtls
interrogée/F
irisable/LMS
Israël/MQ
ivoirine/LMF
joujou/X
juponne/u
lésineuse/G
leucorrhée/S
libertine/F
louveteau/X
mémorielle/F
milieu/X
monomotrice/G
monosaccharide/S
obérai/jnmtlw
objectiverai/jnmtlx
obstruerai/jnmtlx
obturer/Mnmtl
occidentalise/jnmtlu
ombrageai/jnlw
omniscience/LMS
opératoire/LMS
organeau/LMX
Orly/MQ
où/MU
ouragan/LMS
outrée/F
Ouzbékistan/LM
papyrologie/S
pêcheuse/G
pineau/X
porte-couteau/X
préciputaire/S
prédicatrice/G
projette/u
protubérante/F
ramereau/X
râteleuse/G
remanie/u
riblage/S
ricaneuse/G
ruisseau/X
sérance/u
somptueuse/F
soufreuse/G
sous-arbrisseau/X
stakhanoviste/S
traceuse/G
translate/u
travelling/S
un/LMQU
une/LMQU
unirai/jnmtlx
usais/jnmtlv
vaisseau/X
varioleuse/F
vitrificatrice/G
Yves/MQ
